Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.500

Intent.

It is the intent of the legislature to establish an early childhood state education and assistance program. This special assistance program is a voluntary enrichment program to help prepare some children to enter the common school system and shall be offered only as funds are available. This program is not a part of the basic program of education which must be fully funded by the legislature under Article IX, section 1 of the state Constitution.

[ 1994 c 166 s 1; 1985 c 418 s 1. Formerly RCW 43.215.400, 28A.215.100, 28A.34A.010.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 166: "This act shall take effect July 1, 1994." [ 1994 c 166 s 12.]